Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1374.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The title and section 2 of the act of December 1, 1977 (P.L.237, No.76), known as the Local Economic Revitalization Tax Assistance Act, are amended to read:AN ACTAuthorizing local taxing authorities to provide for tax exemption for [certain deteriorated industrial, commercial and other business] deteriorated property and for new construction in deteriorated areas of economically depressed communities; providing for an exemption schedule and establishing standards and qualifications.12345678910111213141516171819202122 Section 2. Construction.This act shall be construed to authorize local taxing authorities to exempt new construction in deteriorated areas of economically depressed communities and improvements to [certain deteriorated industrial, commercial and other business] deteriorated property thereby implementing Article VIII, section 2(b)(iii) of the Constitution of Pennsylvania.Section 2. The definitions of "deteriorated property" and "local taxing authority" in section 3 of the act are amended and the section is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:"Converted residential portion." A portion of a building or structure that previously served a use other than residential use and has been converted or improved to provide residential use, including an associated area of the property that serves the converted residential portion, such as resident or guest parking."Deteriorated property." Any [industrial, commercial or other business property owned by an individual, association orcorporation, and located in a deteriorating area, as hereinafterprovided, or any such property which has been the subject of an order by a government agency requiring the unit to be vacated,condemned or demolished by reason of noncompliance with laws,ordinance or regulations.] of the following:(1) An industrial, commercial or other business property or property previously used for governmental purposes, including a school, owned by an individual, association or 20260SB1374PN1786 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 corporation that is located in a deteriorated area.(2) A property that has been the subject of an order by a government agency requiring the property to be vacated, condemned or demolished by reason of noncompliance with laws, ordinances or regulations.(3) A property that is no longer in use and must be demolished to make residential use economically viable."Dwelling unit." A building or portion of a building intended for occupancy as separate living quarters by one or more individuals and containing living, sleeping, cooking and sanitation facilities for the exclusive use of the occupants.* * *"Local taxing authority." A county, city, borough, incorporated town, township[, institution district] or school district having authority to levy real property taxes."Mixed-use building." A building or portion of a building that combines residential use with a use other than residential use, including business, commercial, industrial, cultural or institutional use.* * *"Residential building." As follows:(1) A building or portion of a building that contains one or more dwelling units, including any of the following:(i) A detached, semidetached or attached one-family or two-family dwelling, including a townhouse, row house or associated accessory dwelling unit.(ii) A duplex, triplex, quadplex or other multifamily dwelling, including an apartment building.(iii) The portion of a mixed-use building intended for residential use.20260SB1374PN1786 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The term does not include a hotel, motel, transient lodging establishment, dormitory, institutional group living facility or other occupancy in which the primary purpose is temporary housing, accommodation or custodial care."Residential use." The occupancy or intended occupancy of a building or portion of a building through one or more dwelling units as a permanent home or residence.Section 3. Section 4(a) of the act is amended to read:Section 4. Deteriorated areas.(a) Each local taxing authority may by ordinance or resolution exempt from real property taxation the assessed valuation of improvements to deteriorated properties and the assessed valuation of new construction within the respective municipal governing bodies designated deteriorated areas of economically depressed communities in the amounts and in accordance with the provisions and limitations hereinafter set forth. Prior to the adoption of the ordinance or resolution authorizing the granting of tax exemptions, the municipal governing body shall affix the boundaries of a deteriorated area or areas, wholly or partially located within its jurisdiction, if any. At least one public hearing shall be held by the municipal governing body for the purpose of determining said boundaries. At the public hearing the local taxing authorities, planning commission or redevelopment authority and other public and private agencies and individuals, knowledgeable and interested in the improvement of deteriorated areas, shall present their recommendations concerning the location of boundaries of a deteriorated area or areas for the guidance of the municipal governing bodies, such recommendations taking into account the criteria set forth in the act of May 24, 1945 20260SB1374PN1786 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (P.L.991, No.385), known as the "Urban Redevelopment Law," for the determination of "blighted areas," and the criteria set forth in [the act of November 29, 1967 (P.L.636, No.292), known as the "Neighborhood Assistance Act,"] Article XIX-A of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the "Tax Reform Code of 1971," for the determination of "impoverished areas," and the following criteria: unsafe, unsanitary and overcrowded buildings; vacant, overgrown and unsightly lots of ground; a disproportionate number of tax delinquent properties, excessive land coverage, defective design or arrangement of buildings, street or lot layouts; economically and socially undesirable land uses. Property adjacent to areas meeting the criteria of this section, but which would not otherwise qualify, may be included within the deteriorated area designated if the local taxing authority determines that new construction on such property would encourage, enhance or accelerate improvement of the deteriorated properties within economically depressed communities. The ordinance or resolution shall specify a description of each such area as determined by the municipal governing body, as well as the cost of improvements per unit to be exempted, and the schedule of taxes exempted as hereinafter provided.* * *Section 4. Section 5(b)(1) of the act is amended and the subsection is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 5. Exemption schedule.* * *(b) Whether or not the assessment eligible for exemption is based upon actual cost or a maximum cost, the actual amount of taxes exempted shall be in accordance with the schedule of taxes 20260SB1374PN1786 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 exempted established by a local taxing authority subject to the following limitations:(1) The length of the schedule of taxes exempted for new construction or improvement that does not include residential use and does not occur within or result in a residential building shall not exceed ten years.(1.1) The length of the schedule of taxes exempted for new construction or improvement that includes residential use or occurs within or results in a residential building shall not exceed 20 years.* * *Section 5. Section 6 of the act is amended to read:Section 6. Procedure for obtaining exemption.(a) Any person desiring tax exemption pursuant to ordinances or resolutions adopted pursuant to this act, shall notify each local taxing authority granting such exemption in writing on a form provided by [it] the local taxing authority submitted at the time [he] the person secures the building permit, or if no building permit or other notification of new construction or improvement is required, at the time [he] the person commences construction. A copy of the exemption request shall be forwarded to the board of assessment and revision of taxes or other appropriate assessment agency. The assessment agency shall, after completion of the new construction or improvement, assess separately the new construction or improvement, including a converted residential portion, and calculate the amounts of the assessment eligible for tax exemption in accordance with the limits established by the local taxing authorities and notify the taxpayer and the local taxing authorities of the reassessment and amounts of the assessment eligible for 20260SB1374PN1786 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 exemption. Appeals from the reassessment and the amounts eligible for the exemption may be taken by the taxpayer or the local taxing authorities as provided by law.(b) The cost of new construction or improvements to be exempted and the schedule of taxes exempted existing at the time of the initial request for tax exemption shall be applicable to that exemption request, and subsequent amendment to the ordinance, if any, shall not apply to requests initiated prior to their adoption. For purposes of this subsection, the tax exemption schedule for an exemption request shall be the schedule under section 5(b)(1) or (1.1), whichever applies to the new construction or improvement, in effect at the time of the initial request for tax exemption.Section 6. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 6.1. Public registry.(a) The Department of Community and Economic Development shall, within one year of the effective date of this subsection, publish and maintain on its publicly accessible Internet website a public registry listing each local taxing authority that has adopted an ordinance or resolution under this act that is in effect on the effective date of this subsection.(b) The Department of Community and Economic Development shall update the public registry biennially and shall include a hyperlink to a copy of each adopted ordinance or resolution in effect for the local taxing authority at the time of the biennial update.(c) This section shall apply to an ordinance or resolution in effect regardless of whether the ordinance or resolution was adopted before, on or after the effective date of this subsection.20260SB1374PN1786 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 7. The amendment or addition of sections 5(b)(1) and (1.1) and 6 of the act shall apply to an ordinance or resolution adopted or amended under this act on or after the effective date of this section. An ordinance or resolution adopted before the effective date of this section shall continue in effect until amended or repealed.Section 8. This act shall take effect immediately.20260SB1374PN1786 - 8 - 1234567